Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,154
Grant; availability; amount; priorities.

(1) Beginning on April 17, 2024, a grant under the program shall be available to an individual who applies for the grant and who:

(a) Is a resident of the State of Nebraska;

(b) Is teaching full-time or has a contract to teach full-time at the time of the application for the program;

(c) Has taught in Nebraska five years or less at the time of the application or renewal; and

(d) Has an individual income that is less than fifty-five thousand dollars per year.

(2) The amount of a grant awarded to an eligible applicant pursuant to this section shall be limited to five thousand dollars per year. An eligible applicant may be awarded a grant for up to five years.

(3) If the funds available for grants in any year are insufficient to provide grants to all eligible applicants described in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall establish priorities to award grants with renewal applications given priority over initial applications. For initial applications, priority shall be given to applicants who demonstrate financial need.

Laws 2024, LB1284, § 9.
April 17, 2024